Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-121
Sections; interpretation.

Sections 76-101 to 76-123 shall be so interpreted and construed as to effectuate their general purpose to make uniform the law of those states which enact them.

Laws 1941, c. 153, § 21, p. 598;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 76-1021;

R.S.1943, § 76-121.

Uniform act is to be construed so as to effectuate its general purpose. Ellingrod v. Trombla, 168 Neb. 264, 95 N.W.2d 635 (1959).